morphology/spellChecker/normalizer/normalizer-relaxSpellcheck.foma
       # transitive forms
       define watrans [  "@WA"  => "+1.Obj" ?* _  ];
       define sutrans [  "@SU"  => "+2.Obj" ?* _  ];
       
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # if in lower side {rqu} as {rqa}, {pu} as {pa} etc. -> we want those forms to appear on the upper side as well               #
       # (otherwise rqa/pa would appear as rqu/pu in the output, which would be wrong given the morphological context of these forms #
       # for normalizer: rewrite ru as rqu and ra as rqa, respectivly, same with  yu/yku, ya/yka                                     #
       # NOTE: sequence -rqa-ku will be normalized to -rqu-ku !                                                                      #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define rqurqa5 [ {rqa}"+rqu+" <- {rqu}"+rqu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa6 [ {rqu}"+ru+" <- {ru}"+ru+" \\ _ ?* ~$["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa7 [ {rqa}"+ru+" <- {ru}"+ru+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       
       define ykuyka3 [ {yka}"+yku+" <- {yku}"+yku+" \\ _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka4 [ {yku}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ~$["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka5 [ {yka}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];

       define mpuDIR2 [ {m}"+mu+" <- {mu}"+mu+"  \\  _ ?* "@PU" ];

       define pupa2 [ {pa}"+pu+" <- {pu}"+pu+" \\  _  ?* ["@KU"|"@MU"] ];
       define kuka2 [ {ka}"+ku+" <- {ku}"+ku+" \\  _  ?* ["@MU"|"@CHI"|"@PU"|"+Rzpr"] ];

      define VerbRulesUpper  naRzpr .o. shortYKU .o. rqurqa5 .o. rqurqa6 .o. rqurqa7 .o. ykuyka3 .o. ykuyka4 .o. ykuyka5 .o. mpuDIR2  .o. pupa2 .o. kuka2 .o. watrans .o. sutrans;

       #-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # rqu --> rqa before mu, pu , ri ,ysi (rqa can only be +Rptn in this position, everywhere   #
       # else, it's supposed to be NPst                                                            #
       #-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define rqurqa1 [ {rqu}"@RQU"-> {rqa}"@RQU"  || _  ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa2 [ {ru}"@RQU"-> {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa3 [ {rqu}"@RQU" (->) {rqa}"@RQU"  || _  ?* "@KU"];
       define rqurqa4 [ {ru}"@RQU" (->) {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* "@KU"];      

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -yku becomes -yka before -mu, -pu, -ysi, -chi, -ri, -cha                             #
       # and -na. Seems not always to be the case, therefore, this rule is optional (->)      #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define ykuyka1 [ {yku}"@YKU" (->) {yka}"@YKU" || _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka2 [ {yu}"@YKU" (->) {ya}"@YKU" || _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -mu translocative --> as -m only before pu (might otherwise be confused wth -mpa, positional, -mpu can be written as npu #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define mpuDIR [ {mu}"@MU" -> [n|m]"@MU"  ||  _ ?* "@PU" ];

       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # pu regressive --> pa only before ku and mu (might otherwise be confused with -pa repetitive) #
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define pupa [ {pu}"@PU" -> {pa}"@PU" ||  _  ?* ["@KU"|"@MU"] ];

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # ku reflexive --> ka before chi and mu and pu (possibley before na (?) #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define kuka [ {ku}"@KU" -> {ka}"@KU" ||  _  ?* ["@MU"|"@CHI"|"@PU"|"+Rzpr"] ];

   define VerbRulesLower rqurqa1 .o. rqurqa2  .o. rqurqa3 .o. rqurqa4 .o. ykuyka1 .o. ykuyka2  .o. mpuDIR .o. pupa .o. kuka ;


       ##############
       # AMBIVALENT #
       ##############

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # evidential suffixes mi,si,cha as -m,-s,-ch only after vowel. Apply rule to complete word form, after cleanup #
       # of flags, otherwise the context might not be right                                                           #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       #define EVID1 [ {mi}"@MI" -> [{m}|{n}]"@MI"  ||Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID2 [ {si}"@SI" -> {s}"@SIu" || Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID3 [ {chi}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID4 [ {cha}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowel  _ ];

	define SI1 [  {s}"@SI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define SI2 [  {si}"@SI" => Cons _  ];

	define MI1 [  {m}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI2 [  {n}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI3 [  {mi}"@MI" => Cons _  ];

	define CHA1 [  {ch}"@CHA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define CHA2 [  {chi}"@CHA"  => Cons _  ];
	define CHA3 [  {cha}"@CHA" => Cons _  ];

       #define AmbiRules EVID1 .o. EVID2 .o. EVID3 .o. EVID4;
	define AmbiRules SI1 .o. SI2 .o. MI1 .o. MI2 .o. MI3 .o. CHA1 .o. CHA2 .o. CHA3;



#################################################################################

      #######################
      #                     #
      # AMBIVALENT SUFFIXES #
      #                     #
      #######################

      source  as-1.foma
      source  as-2.foma
      source  as-3.foma
      source  as-4.foma
      source  as-5.foma
      source  as-6.foma
      source  as-7.foma
      define HonAff [ {lla}  "+Lim_Aff" ] : {lla} ;

      define AS [(HonAff) (AS=1) (HonAff) (AS=2) (AS=3)^{0,2} (HonAff) (AS=4) (HonAff) (AS=5) (AS=6) (AS=7)] ;


####################################################################################

       ##########
       #        #
       # VERBS  #
       #        #
       ##########

       source vroot.foma
       source vroot-es.foma
          define VRootES VRootESpre .o. SPanOrtho;
       source vroot-trans.foma
	  define VRootTrans VRootTranspre .o. QuechuaOrtho;

       define VROOTpre [VRootQ] .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       define VROOT [VROOTpre|VRootES];

       source v-v-1.foma
       source v-v-2.foma
       source v-v-3.foma
       source v-v-4.foma
       source  v-v-5.foma
       source  v-v-6-norm.foma
       source v-v-7.foma

    define VerbSuffixes  VerbRulesUpper  .o. [(HonAff) V=V=1^{0,4} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,3} (HonAff) (V=V=1) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4)(HonAff) (V=V=5) (HonAff) V=V=6 (V=V=7)]  .o. VerbRulesLower .o. QuechuaOrtho;


#####################################################################################

       #########
       #       #
       # NOUNS #
       #       #
       #########

       source nroot.foma 
       source nroot-num.foma 
       source nroot.foma
       source nroot-indef.foma
       source nroot-cmp.foma
         define NRootCMP NRootCMPpre .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       source nroot-es.foma
         define NRootES NRootESpre .o. SpanOrtho;

       define NROOTpre [NRootQ|NRootNUM|NRootINDEF] .o. QuechuaOrtho ; 
       define NROOT [NROOTpre|NRootES];

       source n-n-1.foma
       source  n-n-2.foma
       source  n-n-3.foma
       #nominal transitive forms
       source  npers.foma 
       source n-n-4.foma
       source  n-n-5.foma
       source  n-n-6.foma
       source  n-n-7.foma

       define NounSuffixes  [(N=N=1) (HonAff) N=N=2^{0,2} (HonAff) (N=N=5) (HonAff) (N=N=3) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (N=N=5)^{0,3} (HonAff) N=N=6^{0,3} N=N=7^{0,2} (HonAff)]  .o. QuechuaOrtho ;
     
######################################################################################

      ######################
      #                    #
      # DERIVED ROOTS      #
      #                    #
      ######################


       source n-v.foma
       source  v-n-relax.foma 
       #mit diesen Suffixen nominalisierte Verben können nicht wieder verbalisiert werden
       source  v-n-final.foma
       source  v-n-transitive.foma
       define Relational [ {n} "+Rel" : {n} ];
       define VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS  VerbRulesUpper .o. [V=V=1^{0,3} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,5} (HonAff) (V=V=1) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4) (HonAff)] .o. VerbRulesLower;
       
       #------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs:     #
       # VRoot + VtoN = NDeriv1 #
       # "taki-qti", "taki-y"   #
       #------------------------#
       define NDeriv1 [VROOT  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv1final [VROOT  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];

       #----------------------------#
       # verbalized nouns:          #
       # NRoot + NtoV = VDeriv1     #
       # "wasi-n-cha-", "hatun-ya-" #
       # NtoV: -ykacha/kacha as     #
       # verbalizing suffix         #
       #----------------------------#
       define VDeriv1 [NROOT (Relational) (HonAff) NtoV];

       #--------------------------------#
       # nominalized verb Nr.2:         #
       # NRoot + NtoV + VtoN = NDeriv2  #
       # "wasi-n-cha-y", "hatun-ya-sqa" #
       #--------------------------------#
       define NDeriv2 [VDeriv1  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv2final [VDeriv1  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];

       #--------------------------------#
       # verbalized noun Nr.2:          #
       # VRoot + VtoN + NtoV = VDeriv1  #
       # "yaku-naya-q"                  #
       #--------------------------------#
       define VDeriv2 [NDeriv1 NtoV];

       #-------------------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs Nr.3:             #
       # VRoot + VtoN + NtoV +VtoN = NDeriv3 #
       # "yuya-y-cha-ku-y"                   #
       #-------------------------------------#
       define NDeriv3 [VDeriv2  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv3final [VDeriv2  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];
       
       #-------------------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs with transitiv    #
       # person markins (in npers.regex)     #
       # "apamuwanaykichik",                 #
       # "yupaychasunaykichik"               #
       #-------------------------------------#
       define NDeriv1finalTrans [VROOT  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinalTrans];
       define NDeriv1finalTrans2 [(VDeriv2|VDeriv1)  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinalTrans]

#define NDERIV [NDeriv1|NDeriv1final|NDeriv2|NDeriv2final|NDeriv3|NDeriv3final];
define NDERIV [NDeriv1|NDeriv2|NDeriv3];
define NDERIVFINAL [NDeriv1final|NDeriv2final|NDeriv3final];
define VDERIV [VDeriv1|VDeriv2];

       ###########################################
       #                                         #
       # verbs with incorporated nominal root    #
       #                                         #
       ###########################################
       define VRootInc [NRootQ VRootTrans];
       
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # nominalized verb with incorporated nominal root:       #
       # "uywamichiy"                                           #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define NRootInc [VRootInc  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS [VtoN|VtoNfinal]];
